North Carolina, session 2025, HB140.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The General Assembly authorizes the Department of Natural and
Cultural Resources to add the Gullah Geechee Greenway/Blueway Heritage Trail (Heritage
Trail) in Brunswick County to the State Parks System as a State trail, as provided in
*H140-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
G.S. 143B-135.54(b). The Department shall support, promote, encourage, and facilitate the
establishment of trail segments on State park lands and on lands of other federal, State, local, and
private landowners. On segments of the Heritage Trail that cross property controlled by agencies
or owners other than the Department's Division of Parks and Recreation, the laws, rules, and
policies of those agencies or owners shall govern the use of the property. The requirement of
G.S. 143B-135.54(b) that additions be accompanied by adequate appropriations for land
acquisition, development, and operations shall not apply to the authorization set forth in this
section; provided, however, that the State may receive donations of appropriate land and may
purchase other needed lands for the Heritage Trail with existing funds in the Land and Water
Fund, the Parks and Recreation Trust Fund, the federal Land and Water Conservation Fund, and
other available sources of funding.
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 140-First Edition